trunk/ashaninka/morphology/AshaninkaMorph/asheninka.script
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # delete all tags and special chars in surface forms     #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1  [["@EP"|"@PRONLEN"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@EP"|"@PRONLEN"]];

      define Vowels [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z];

      #--------------------------------#
      # allow upper/lower case letters #
      #--------------------------------#

      define Lowercase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ];

      ##########################
      #        Ortography      #
      # Normalization Patterns #
      #                        #
      ##########################

      define QUIReplacement [ {ky} (->) {qui} || _ [a|á] ];
      define QUReplacement [ {k} (->) {qu} || _ [e|i|é|í] ,, {k} (->) {qü} || _ [e|i|é|í] ];
      define CReplacement [ {k} (->) {c} || _ [a|o|u|á|é|í] ];

      define JReplacement [ {h} (->) {j} || _ Vowels ];

      define BReplacement [ {v} (->) {b} || _ Vowels ];
      define WReplacement [ {v} (->) {w} || _ Vowels ];

      define PIReplacement [ {py} (->) {pi} || _ [a|á] ];
      define KIReplacement [ {ky} (->) {ki} || _ [a|á] ,, {ky} (->) {qy} || _ [a|á] ]; 
      define RIReplacement [ {ry} (->) {ri} || _ [a|á] ];

      define TIReplacement [ {ty} (->) {ti} || _ [e|é] ];

      define NYReplacement [ {ny} (->) {ñ} || _ Vowels ];
      define VowelsWithAccent [ {a} (->) {á}, {e} (->) {é}, {i} (->) {í},{o} (->) {ó}, {u} (->) {ú}];

      define Orthography [ QUIReplacement .o. QUReplacement .o. CReplacement .o. JReplacement .o. BReplacement .o. WReplacement 
.o. PIReplacement .o. KIReplacement .o. RIReplacement .o. TIReplacement .o. NYReplacement .o. VowelsWithAccent ];

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #          Verbs         #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      source v-p-1.foma
      source v-p-2.foma

      define Pref [(P=1) (P=2)] ;

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #        Epenthesis      #
      #                        #
      ##########################
      define AEpenthesisRule1 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || t _ v ]; 
      define AEpenthesisRule2 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || r _ y ]; 

      define AEpenthesisRule3 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || s _ r ]; # pinkatsari
      define AEpenthesisRule4 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || k _ m ]; # notoncamento
      define AEpenthesisRule5 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || t _ m ]; # itotamento
      define AEpenthesisRule6 [ "@EP" -> {a}"@EP" || k _ n ]; # notyoonkantsi

      define TEpenthesisRule1 [ "@EP" -> {t}"@EP" || i _ i ]; 
      define TEpenthesisRule2 [ "@EP" -> {t}"@EP" || a _ a ]; 
      define TEpenthesisRule3 [ "@EP" -> {t}"@EP" || e _ a ]; 
      define TEpenthesisRule4 [ "@EP" -> {t}"@EP" || a _ e ]; 
      define TEpenthesisRule5 [ "@EP" -> {t}"@EP" || o _ a ]; 
      define TZEpenthesisRule1 [ "@EP" -> {tz}"@EP" || e _ i ]; ! ^EP IRREALIS ; 
      define TZEpenthesisRule2 [ "@EP" -> {tz}"@EP" || a _ i ]; 

      define Epenthesis [ AEpenthesisRule1 .o. AEpenthesisRule2 .o. AEpenthesisRule3 .o. AEpenthesisRule4 .o. AEpenthesisRule5 .o. AEpenthesisRule6 
.o. TEpenthesisRule1 .o. TEpenthesisRule2 
.o. TEpenthesisRule3 .o. TEpenthesisRule4 .o. TEpenthesisRule5 .o. TZEpenthesisRule1 .o. TZEpenthesisRule2 ];

      ##########################
      #                        #
      #        Transitive      #
      #                        #
      ##########################
       define TransSubj1 [ "[1SG.A+]" <- "[1SG.S+]" || _ ?* "[+1SG.O]"];
       define TransSubj2 [ "[2SG.A+]" <- "[2SG.S+]" || _ ?* "[+2SG.O]"];
       define TransSubj3 [ "[3SGm.A+]" <- "[3SGm.S+]" || _ ?* "[+3SGm.O]"];
       define TransSubj4 [ "[3SGnm.A+]" <- "[3SGnm.S+]" || _ ?* "[+3SGnm.O]"];
       define TransSubj5 [ "[1PL.A+]" <- "[1PL.S+]" || _ ?* "[+1PL.O]"];
      define VerbRules TransSubj1 .o. TransSubj2 .o. TransSubj3 .o. TransSubj4 .o. TransSubj5 ;

      source v-s-1.foma
      source v-s-2.foma
      source v-s-3.foma
      source v-s-4.foma
#      source v-s-5.foma
#      source v-s-6.foma
#      source v-s-7.foma

      define V=S=PRNO [
         "[+1SG.O]" : "@EP"{na}
       | "[+2SG.O]" : "@EP"{mi}
       | "[+3SGm.O]" : "@EP"{ri}
       | "[+3SGnm.O]" : "@EP"{ro}
       | "[+1PL.O]" : "@EP"{ai}
      ];
      
      define V=S=IRR [
       "[+IRR]" : "@EP"[{e}|{ia}|{n}|{ri}|{ye}|{a}|{i}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DIR [
       "[+DIR]" : "@EP"[{av}|{an}|{ap}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=PRF [
       "[+PRF]" : "@EP"[{ak}|{aka}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=OPT [
       "[+OPT]" : "@EP"[{ta}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=PL [
       "[+PL]" : "@EP"[{he}|{paye}|{ni}|{aiy}|{het}|{ite}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=REGR [
       "[+REGR]" : "@EP"[{a}|{ah}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=CNTF [
       "[+CNT.F]" : "@EP"[{mi}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=AUG [
       "[+AUG]" : "@EP"[{piro}|{ni}|{pero}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DUR [
       "[+DUR]" : "@EP"[{vai}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=BEN [
       "[+BEN]" : "@EP"[{vint}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADVP [
       "[+ADV.P]" : "@EP"[{ranki}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADV [
       "[+ADV]" : "@EP"[{ra}|{ka}|{nta}|{ranki}|{paite}|{ni}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=APPR [
       "[+APPR]" : "@EP"[{kari}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ICPL [
       "[+ICPL]" : "@EP"[{it}|{e}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=REL [
       "[+REL]" : "@EP"[{ri}|{ni}|{ka}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=IMPP [
       "[+IMP.P]" : "@EP"[{ai}|{t}|{tz}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=quickly [
       "[+quickly]" : "@EP"[{ite}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=EXCL [
       "[+EXCL]" : "@EP"[{ve}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=Q [
       "[+Q]" : "@EP"[{ka}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=APPL [
       "[+APPL]" : "@EP"[{ako}|{t}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=noun [
       "[+noun]" : "@EP"[{vatsa}|{pori}|{ani}|{atziri}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=disheveledhead [
       "[+disheveled.head]" : "@EP"[{menkotzi}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DIM [
       "[+DIM]" : "@EP"[{nint}|{ni}|{ini}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=CL [
       "[+CL]" : "@EP"[{}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=3mposs [
       "[+3m.poss]" : "@EP"[{i}|{y}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=NMZ [
       "[+NMZ]" : "@EP"[{nka}|{ri}|{nk}|{ntsi}|{antsi}|{rintsi}|{rentsi}|{mento}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADJ [
       "[+ADJ]" : "@EP"[{ri}|{tsinkari}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=once [
       "[+once]" : "@EP"[{apaint}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=APPLINT [
       "[+APPL.INT]" : "@EP"[{ashi}|{tz}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=REP [
       "[+REP]" : "@EP"[{a}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=poss [
       "[+poss]" : "@EP"[{ni}|{te}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=EMPH [
       "[+EMPH]" : "@EP"[{tya}|{kya}|{poo}|{ha}|{tzi}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=APPLBEN [
       "[+APPL.BEN]" : "@EP"[{vent}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=one [
       "[+one]" : "@EP"[{aparoni}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DEM [
       "[+DEM]" : "@EP"[{ra}|{ka}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=RCP [
       "[+RCP]" : "@EP"[{av}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=REV [
       "[+REV]" : "@EP"[{ry}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADJnm [
       "[+ADJ.n.m.]" : "@EP"[{nto}|{tsinkaro}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADJm [
       "[+ADJ.m.]" : "@EP"[{ri}|{ntzi}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=before [
       "[+before]" : "@EP"[{it}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADJm [
       "[+ADJ.m]" : "@EP"[{ri}|{tsinkari}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=ADJnm [
       "[+ADJ.n.m]" : "@EP"[{ro}|{nto}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=deceased [
       "[+deceased]" : "@EP"[{ni}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=smallpart [
       "[+small.part]" : "@EP"[{patsa}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DEGR [
       "[+DEGR]" : "@EP"[{piro}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=small [
       "[+small]" : "@EP"[{kapichi}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=only [
       "[+only]" : "@EP"[{intaani}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=INCH [
       "[+INCH]" : "@EP"[{ima}|{imai}|{amaint}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=DIMDEGR [
       "[+DIM.DEGR]" : "@EP"[{nint}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=flat [
       "[+flat]" : "@EP"[{miront}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=early [
       "[+early]" : "@EP"[{aman}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=forawhile [
       "[+for.a.while]" : "@EP"[{apaint}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=notyet [
       "[+not.yet]" : "@EP"[{tekira}]
      ];
      
      define V=S=REC [
       "[+REC]" : "@EP"[{av}]
      ];
      
